Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1312
Agency; powers.

(1) The agency may:

(a) Make necessary public or private investigations within or outside of this state to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 or any rule or order under the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315, or to aid in the enforcement of the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315 or in the prescribing of rules and forms under the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315; and

(b) Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the agency determines, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

(2) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under sections 76-1301 to 76-1315, the agency or any officer designated by rule may administer oaths or affirmations, and upon its own motion or upon request of any party shall subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition and location of any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 12.